{"post-75995": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1512209113000", "message": "If the snarl inches from his face wasn't enough to cause Ash to recoil in horror, the rolling smell of rotting meat panting out in hot breaths would be. The young man, staggered backwards from the source of his discomfort, a nearly seven foot tall, bipedal hyena, that yanked hard on the chain fastened to the metal collar around his throat, causing him to staggered forward with a strangled gasp for air. Gnolls were known for their cruelty, and their slaving, and Ash was no exception to this rule. He hardly struggled against the chain bindings that went from his collar to his manacles. He knew the score by now.\u00a0Wrinkling his nose in distaste at the repugnant odor of the creature that tugged him and a line of fellow slaves along towards a series of structures. He didn't know what they were building, and he knew that by the time they finished building them he'd likely be in several of the disgusting beast's stomachs. At the sound of wagon wheels he turned his dull gray gaze towards the entryway of the camp. Another load. He didn't know where these creatures kept getting slaves, if they were all the same as him: stolen in their homes by surprise raids, or if they were trading or something more sophisticated. He hoped he didn't have to find out.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "If the snarl inches from his face wasn't enough to cause Ash to recoil in horror, the rolling smell of rotting meat panting out in hot breaths would be. The young man, staggered backwards from the source of his discomfort, a nearly seven foot tall, bipedal hyena, that yanked hard on the chain fastened to the metal collar around his throat, causing him to staggered forward with a strangled gasp for air. Gnolls were known for their cruelty, and their slaving, and Ash was no exception to this rule. He hardly struggled against the chain bindings that went from his collar to his manacles. He knew the score by now.\u00a0"}, "post-75996": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1512210068000", "message": "There was one in that wagon, curled up in a corner of the back and trembling. She was absolutely terrified. She didn't know where they were going, and she didn't want to know. Despite the weight of the iron about her wrists and the heavy chains between them, she poked her head up over the wall of the cart - frantic eyes sweeping around for some sign of a chance for freedom. Instead, she saw the ugly maw of one of the beasts - and he snarled at her.Without a word she ducked right back down and remained curled up in that corner. It was only when the wagon wheels finally creaked to a stop that she whimpered in fear. She saw as several of the tall, burly Gnolls were snatching others like her from the back of the wagon. Hearing them yell and scream and seeing them kick and flail with rattling chains only instilled the dread of the situation further. She remained right where she was, peering up to the sky only when something cast a shadow over her.That grinning maw was pointed at her, and his hands came over to grab a handful of her hair and her arm - anyone would see him literally fling the screaming young woman from the cart and drag her to her feet, as well as pull her along as she utterly refused to keep from kicking and flailing in a desperate attempt to break free.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "There was one in that wagon, curled up in a corner of the back and trembling. She was absolutely terrified. She didn't know where they were going, and she didn't want to know. Despite the weight of the iron about her wrists and the heavy chains between them, she poked her head up over the wall of the cart - frantic eyes sweeping around for some sign of a chance for freedom. Instead, she saw the ugly maw of one of the beasts - and he snarled at her."}, "post-75997": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1512211175000", "message": "Attempting to continue on his way to the buildings proved fruitless, as his chain was yanked and he gasped again, staggering in an attempt to keep his footing. He should have known it wouldn't let him walk past. They always loved to let the older prisoners see the new ones. To know they were going to be replaced, and just like a horse that had outlived its use, butchered. Watching as one of the gnolls grabbed a young girl, he shook his head almost imperceptibly. \"Don't fight,\" he wished he could say. \"It only makes things worse.\" Yet even as the thoughts arose, the ever-present squeeze of the collar reminded him of the punishment for speaking out of turn. Biting his lip, he flinched when the girl hit the ground with a painful-sounding thud. He wanted to say something, a little part of his righteous indignation that hadn't completely been snubbed out in his year of \"faithful service,\" but the pain of the lash clung to him like a miasma of fear and cowardice. \"Don't fight,\" he whispered softly, as though his words might carry to her on the breeze, but he knew the truth. It was fruitless. She was in here to die, just as he had, and just as who-knows how many others had been before him. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Attempting to continue on his way to the buildings proved fruitless, as his chain was yanked and he gasped again, staggering in an attempt to keep his footing. He should have known it wouldn't let him walk past. They always loved to let the older prisoners see the new ones. To know they were going to be replaced, and just like a horse that had outlived its use, butchered. Watching as one of the gnolls grabbed a young girl, he shook his head almost imperceptibly. \"Don't fight,\" he wished he could say. \"It only makes things worse.\" Yet even as the thoughts arose, the ever-present squeeze of the collar reminded him of the punishment for speaking out of turn. Biting his lip, he flinched when the girl hit the ground with a painful-sounding thud. "}, "post-75998": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1512211929000", "message": "The girl continued to fight, pleading and sobbing as she was dragged, until finally the Gnoll grew tired of her antics - she hit the ground again when he threw her. A pained yelp came past her lips, but she strained to get back onto her feet, and run anywhere but here. Sadly it wasn't to be - the first thing to her eyes was an enslaved man watching her with eyes that were full of pity, and she reached out her chained hands to him as she lunged for him, as if he could help her.In the next instance she felt a tightening grip around her throat that cut off her air and her hands flew to her neck. There was something wrapped about her throat, a thin and tightly woven rope that refused to give. She hadn't seen the second Gnoll that came up behind her and looped it over her head. Her momentum redirected, she found herself on her knees at the feet of her next handler and looking up to him with pleading eyes as she struggled to pry the rope lose.He only snarled and turned to walk, pulling her along. Every time she lost her footing she was dragged without remorse, which forced her to scramble to find her feet again. Every tug on that rope cut off her air again, and she was desperate for a breath. She had no choice but to scamper along, choking and gasping as tears rolled down her cheeks.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The girl continued to fight, pleading and sobbing as she was dragged, until finally the Gnoll grew tired of her antics - she hit the ground again when he threw her. A pained yelp came past her lips, but she strained to get back onto her feet, and run anywhere but here. Sadly it wasn't to be - the first thing to her eyes was an enslaved man watching her with eyes that were full of pity, and she reached out her chained hands to him as she lunged for him, as if he could help her."}, "post-75999": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1512212627000", "message": "When the younger girl tried to reach him, Ash's hands lifted somewhat against the weight of his manacles, as if wanting to reach out to her, but as if sensing that though he felt his handler tug the rope just enough to send him into a fit of coughing, reminding him of his place. Then, before he could convince himself to perform some feat of heroism, the girl was gone, tugged along behind another gnoll as his own tugged at his chain mercilessly, leading him away from the scene. He steeled himself, heading for the construction. Maybe she'd be put on the carpentry role. Harry had just died the day before, perhaps they'd be looking to fill in the spot. She was young though, and small, meaning perhaps she'd be put on a less labor-intensive job. Either way, he knew, he could see her at dinner. He had to talk to her, to tell her to avoid what she could. Picking up a heavy hammer he began hammering in nails, glancing around at the others who had seemed not even to bat an eye at the girl's cruel entrance. Had they really fallen so far? Had he really fallen so far? Perhaps the old him would have done something. Tried to help. Was he wiser now? Or merely a coward, justifying his hesitation with half-baked lies?", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When the younger girl tried to reach him, Ash's hands lifted somewhat against the weight of his manacles, as if wanting to reach out to her, but as if sensing that though he felt his handler tug the rope just enough to send him into a fit of coughing, reminding him of his place. Then, before he could convince himself to perform some feat of heroism, the girl was gone, tugged along behind another gnoll as his own tugged at his chain mercilessly, leading him away from the scene. He steeled himself, heading for the construction. Maybe she'd be put on the carpentry role. Harry had just died the day before, perhaps they'd be looking to fill in the spot. She was young though, and small, meaning perhaps she'd be put on a less labor-intensive job. Either way, he knew, he could see her at dinner. He had to talk to her, to tell her to avoid what she could. "}, "post-76000": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1512223643000", "message": "Where were they going? What was going to happen to her? She tried to look around the compound under construction, and it quickly became clear that she was going to be put to work. Her feet scraped the ground in haste to keep up, though it became harder as she stepped across unseen debris in the dirt and it hurt, her first instinct to hop off her afflicted foot which only made her struggle to breathe each time.Finally she was thrown to the ground once more, besides several that had been in the wagon with her - most of them cowering and whimpering. She had been herded with a number of females when she had been caught, and they were all pressing close to each other to get as far away from their captors as possible. Several of the breed were snatching up some of the girls, looking them over, and a select few were dragged away into an encampment in the center of the structures, plucked away to a number of tents where many more of the beasts were housed.Where were they, and what was planned for them?Her shaking hands went to the rope around her throat to try and loosen the knot, eyes darting everywhere. Her sights met those of a Gnoll standing nearby and he stomped over to where she sat - looming over her as she shrunk down like a submissive animal, her watery eyes pleading silently for mercy. He stood tall and bulky, scarred a number of places with a seemingly dead eye. He was one that had been around for a while, and his eyes showed nothing but disgust and contempt for every human he saw.\"Guess ya need t' learn not t' take off yer damn leash,\" he growled, stepping over her so he was straddled directly above her - grabbing her shackled wrists and yanking them above her head. She couldn't do anything as he dragged her a short distance to where a fallen brace was lying in the dirt, and forced her palms on the wooden surface. Just as she yelped from the slap of her hands down, another Gnoll was coming by - with a thin rod in hand. He had already made his way around, striking at others that were in chains and rags, and he approached with a mission clear in his gaze.She looked at the rod as it was raised before looking to her exposed fingers. Just as she realized what was about to happen, CRACK! The blinding pain that shot through her hands and her arms ripped a shriek from her throat, and no matter how she flailed beneath her captors she couldn't escape. She pleaded through fresh tears as she watched that rod, which felt like a stick rather than metal, was lifted once more. CRACK! CRACK! She screamed until she was hoarse as she felt a total of three lashes across her poor fingers. It was only then that they let her go, where she promptly curled up with her hands cradled to her chest as they ached and throbbed. It felt like they were broken, or at least with this degree of pain she thought so.She had no chance for reprieve as her leash was snatched up and she was dragged across the ground. She choked as her air was cut off again, her hands coming up to just hover uselessly around her neck.To whatever gods were there, she prayed. She prayed and pleaded in silence for help. She swore she would never steal again, just end this.\"You!\" Ash would find the girl dropped beside him, and the Gnoll leaning in to snarl directly at his face - or his ear, if he opted to keep his head down like a good slave. \"Git her workin' - or I'll roast ya' both fer dinner fer th' rest of ya'.\" With that, he turned hard - looking to strike the man at the back of the head - before storming off and leaving the two alone.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Where were they going? What was going to happen to her? She tried to look around the compound under construction, and it quickly became clear that she was going to be put to work. Her feet scraped the ground in haste to keep up, though it became harder as she stepped across unseen debris in the dirt and it hurt, her first instinct to hop off her afflicted foot which only made her struggle to breathe each time."}, "post-76070": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1512353490000", "message": "Even with the den of hammering and construction, one could hear the sounds of the lash, causing the slaves to flinch instinctively and Ash was no exception. His hands tightened into fists, knowing full well the gnolls would be making an example of one of the newest slaves in front of the others. They were nothing if not predictable. It also followed that they'd use their typical tactics, which made his stomach twist into knots. The most vocal, or the most reluctant was inevitably the target meaning... As if in confirmation of his thoughts, he heard a gnoll approaching, quickly dropping to his knees with a painful thud as he buried his own face in the dirt. His reasons were twofold: The reverence could, at times, take the edge off the anger of the more conceited of the slavers. Second, that starting on the floor took away their opportunity to slam you into it and could protect his face. When the gnoll leaned in he trembled in anticipation, his fear overridden by mental preparation to be struck. Nodding at his orders, face still in the ground, he grit his teeth as the blow to the back of his head smashed it into the dirt, the loose grains crushed into his skin. Thankfully he'd been at this long enough to pick up a few tricks of his own, having angled his head so the full force of the brutal punishment would glance off, although that hardly negated it. When the gnoll had stomped away, Ash kept his head to the ground for a few moments, silently counting in his head before sitting up and spitting dirt from his mouth, brushing his face off. Turning his stormy, gray gaze over to the new girl, he got to his feet laboriously, trying not to wobble too much. \"Come,\" he muttered quietly, grabbing her arm firmly but not hard as he led her a little forcefully to her feet. He knew she must be exhausted and scared, and from the looks of her in pain, but he also knew what happened to those who didn't work. \"Were you hit?\" he asked softly, knowing better than to speak too loudly when the beast's keen ears were about. They could hear and smell much better than a human, but their eyesight seemed to suffer for it. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Even with the den of hammering and construction, one could hear the sounds of the lash, causing the slaves to flinch instinctively and Ash was no exception. His hands tightened into fists, knowing full well the gnolls would be making an example of one of the newest slaves in front of the others. They were nothing if not predictable. It also followed that they'd use their typical tactics, which made his stomach twist into knots. The most vocal, or the most reluctant was inevitably the target meaning... As if in confirmation of his thoughts, he heard a gnoll approaching, quickly dropping to his knees with a painful thud as he buried his own face in the dirt. His reasons were twofold: The reverence could, at times, take the edge off the anger of the more conceited of the slavers. Second, that starting on the floor took away their opportunity to slam you into it and could protect his face. "}, "post-76122": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1512451967000", "message": "She was more than thankful when the force on the rope disappeared as she was dropped, and she remained curled up in a pitiful ball until the monster left - just trying to breathe as the noose about her throat was still tight. But it was extremely difficult as her breath was erratic and broken with whimpers and sobs.The girl yelped quietly as she was dragged to her feet once more, trying to find her footing as her head came up and found it wasn't another gnoll but a man that was staring down at her. Her eyes were filled with tears and she trembled. His question would have her bring her hands up from being so close to her body to show where she had been struck - the skin broken and starting to bleed across her knuckles and joints, and the bruising was already beginning to show. Her fingers quivered from the shock, and she was dead afraid to try and work them. They hurt too much. Her mouth opened to say something but all that came out was blubbering as words failed her, and the overwhelming shock and terror took over.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She was more than thankful when the force on the rope disappeared as she was dropped, and she remained curled up in a pitiful ball until the monster left - just trying to breathe as the noose about her throat was still tight. But it was extremely difficult as her breath was erratic and broken with whimpers and sobs."}, "post-76176": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1512529114000", "message": "Scowling grimly at the sight of her wounded hands, Ash opened his mouth to speak once more before she began growing more and more upset. Noticing a gnoll near the palisade wall glancing their way, he grabbed her forearm, leading her further into the worksite, the wooden skeletons of buildings shielding them from view. Spending as long as he had working  on these buildings, he had grown wise to their hiding spots. Of course, you could only stay hidden for so long. Gnolls may not be very bright, but they had a nose for slackers.  Wordlessly he reached out, pressing his palm sideways against her mouth before putting a finger to his lips in a universal shushing. \"If you cry, they come.\" he told her firmly before lowering his hand, keeping an eye on her in case she began m aking noise again. Casting a quick glance around he reached down, tearing a thick strip from her shirt that left him midriff exposed before tearing that one into two pieces. \"Let me see your hands.\" he instructed, preparing to wrap her wounds. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Scowling grimly at the sight of her wounded hands, Ash opened his mouth to speak once more before she began growing more and more upset. Noticing a gnoll near the palisade wall glancing their way, he grabbed her forearm, leading her further into the worksite, the wooden skeletons of buildings shielding them from view. Spending as long as he had working  on these buildings, he had grown wise to their hiding spots. Of course, you could only stay hidden for so long. Gnolls may not be very bright, but they had a nose for slackers.  Wordlessly he reached out, pressing his palm sideways against her mouth before putting a finger to his lips in a universal shushing. "}, "post-76256": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1512646144000", "message": "The girl whimpered miserably as her mouth was covered, but she listened - and he would easily see the fear spark in her eyes at the mention of those horrible beasts possibly coming back. Her head shook a little in decline. She never wanted to upset one of those things again. She struggled to silence her sobs and hiccups, though complete silence was impossible. But she clearly made an effort to calm herself despite everything.When she saw the cloth being ripped and he told her what to do, she carefully lifted her pained hands up for him - a few tears dropping down her cheeks as she looked at the broken skin. She had never had her hands beaten like that before... would she ever use them again? Her imagination scared her with thoughts of her hands no longer moving again. What would she do...?", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The girl whimpered miserably as her mouth was covered, but she listened - and he would easily see the fear spark in her eyes at the mention of those horrible beasts possibly coming back. Her head shook a little in decline. She never wanted to upset one of those things again. She struggled to silence her sobs and hiccups, though complete silence was impossible. But she clearly made an effort to calm herself despite everything."}, "post-76262": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1512670216000", "message": "Ash didn't try and stifle her more pathetic noises that squeaked out. He knew it would be impossible to keep her entirely quiet, and for good reason. Besides, even a gnoll couldn't hear them in the midst of all the construction around them. A couple of other slaves wandered by, clearly slowing down in the time they were in the \"blind spot\" to take advantage of the brief respite, although several of the other men cast them disturbing looks in the process. Although when Ash glared back at them most broke eye-contact. Looking back to the girl, he began winding the wrappings around her mutilated hands. \"Important thing to remember is that the gnolls aren't the only things you should avoid.\" he warned her. They hardly had classes for this stuff, after all, it was best to get started as soon as one could. Those who didn't learned the hard way. \"Try not to go into the blind spots without me if you can help it. Gnolls will stop someone if you're...attacked. Most of the time.\" Winding the makeshift bandages around her hands tightly, he continued to speak to her in an even, but surprisingly well-educated tone for his circumstances. Once her hands were mostly covered with what fabric he could spare, he gave her a satisfied nod. \"But never count on gnolls.\" He still remembered the first time he got ambushed, when he started doing well enough for the gnolls to notice. After that, they started pushing the other slaves harder, thinking they were holding back. One back-alley beating and a few bets passed around by laughing gnolls was enough to make him think twice. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Ash didn't try and stifle her more pathetic noises that squeaked out. He knew it would be impossible to keep her entirely quiet, and for good reason. Besides, even a gnoll couldn't hear them in the midst of all the construction around them. A couple of other slaves wandered by, clearly slowing down in the time they were in the \"blind spot\" to take advantage of the brief respite, although several of the other men cast them disturbing looks in the process. Although when Ash glared back at them most broke eye-contact. Looking back to the girl, he began winding the wrappings around her mutilated hands. "}, "post-76339": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1512804016000", "message": "She bit her lip as he wrapped her hands, wincing from the pain - the passersby made her whimper again as she tried to shuffle around to somewhat hide behind Ash. She didn't like the way they were looking at her... not at all. But the kind man seemed to ward them off with a stare of his own, and she was grateful. She looked up to him again as he spoke, listening closely but only becoming more worried as he warned her. It sounded like she was in trouble no matter where she turned... what was going to become of her here? It seemed the only safety would be in staying at this nice man's side from dawn til dusk.Madailein nodded meekly, trying to scoot a little closer to him. \"I-I-I'll try...\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She bit her lip as he wrapped her hands, wincing from the pain - the passersby made her whimper again as she tried to shuffle around to somewhat hide behind Ash. She didn't like the way they were looking at her... not at all. But the kind man seemed to ward them off with a stare of his own, and she was grateful. She looked up to him again as he spoke, listening closely but only becoming more worried as he warned her. It sounded like she was in trouble no matter where she turned... what was going to become of her here? It seemed the only safety would be in staying at this nice man's side from dawn til dusk."}, "post-76340": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1512804842000", "message": "If Ash noticed her attempts to use him to ward off the threats of this place, he didn't acknowledge it. He certainly didn't tell her that she'd be safe if she did. It was fortunate they were assigned together, he shuddered to think what would have happened had she been handed to someone worse. Or dragged into one of the tents. \"Best advice I can give you is just smear some dirt on your face, keep your head down and do your work.\" he explained hurriedly, already taking her arm and leading her forcefully. \"Come on, it isn't smart to stay here too long. You're in construction now, so I'll show you what to do.\" Once they'd reached the basic frame of a building, he headed over to one of the stacks of lumber. Getting to one knee he rolled it onto his shoulder, standing unsteadily before heading over. \"Ngh...I'll move these...\" he grunted, kneeling so that he could plant one end firmly on the wooden footprint of the building, pushing it up to form a support. Relieved of the weight he nodded at a sack hanging off of a nail, itself full of nails. \"Get those and a mallet off the ground there. You're going to put in the nails where I tell you.\" The work took most of the day, repeating the process of carrying each support beam and setting them up. He didn't know what gnolls would want buildings for, or why they would have these supports and wood cut so finely. In the end, though, it hardly mattered. \"Where are you from?\" he asked as they worked, breaking the silence. \"Where did they get you at? Is your family here?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "If Ash noticed her attempts to use him to ward off the threats of this place, he didn't acknowledge it. He certainly didn't tell her that she'd be safe if she did. It was fortunate they were assigned together, he shuddered to think what would have happened had she been handed to someone worse. Or dragged into one of the tents. \"Best advice I can give you is just smear some dirt on your face, keep your head down and do your work.\" he explained hurriedly, already taking her arm and leading her forcefully. \"Come on, it isn't smart to stay here too long. You're in construction now, so I'll show you what to do.\" "}, "post-76451": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1513042600000", "message": "The girl nodded and trotted along closely beside him as he showed her the job she would be doing, a little nervous as she was unfamiliar with this line of work. But several embedded nails and smashed thumbs later she was getting the hang of it - and learning not to make much noise even when she hurt herself.The question didn't do much to comfort her, though it was nice that he wanted to talk. \"No... I have no family. I'm an orphan. I was... mm.\" She paused a moment as she considered what to say. \"I was... being marched from the gates of my town by the guard. I had a loaf of bread... it wasnt mine,\" she mumbled. \"The, those things...\" Her head jerked an upward nod towards the palisade and the Gnolls patrolling. \"They stormed the gates and snatched up anyone they could into a cart from the travelers around. I couldn't get away...\"She fell quiet, and tried to focus on the nail she was pounding in with her mallet.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The girl nodded and trotted along closely beside him as he showed her the job she would be doing, a little nervous as she was unfamiliar with this line of work. But several embedded nails and smashed thumbs later she was getting the hang of it - and learning not to make much noise even when she hurt herself."}, "post-76452": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1513049953000", "message": "As the girl told him her story, he glanced down at her, not giving any words of comfort but seeming to take in the words with pensively. After she finished, falling quiet he left the most recent post, going to the pile to continue their work. \"I'm sorry.\" he offered her simply. It was too little, he knew, but it was all he had the energy to give anymore. He didn't offer his own story, even though he was sure she must have expected him to. The work was hard, but as time passed in silence, they had managed to set up the proper struts and as they packed hung the nails back on their post, he looked back at their work. \"It sounds foolish, I know.\" he told her softly, the word he'd spoken in well over two hours. \"Even knowing everything I do...it's not bad to look back and see what we made.\" Maybe it was the only comfort left to him. Glancing over at the girl, he crossed his arm. Well, one of the only comforts. \"Come on, we need to get food.\" he told her, walking past as he headed towards the center of camp where noise was gathering. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As the girl told him her story, he glanced down at her, not giving any words of comfort but seeming to take in the words with pensively. After she finished, falling quiet he left the most recent post, going to the pile to continue their work. \"I'm sorry.\" he offered her simply. It was too little, he knew, but it was all he had the energy to give anymore. He didn't offer his own story, even though he was sure she must have expected him to. "}, "post-76475": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1513127619000", "message": "Indeed, she was a little saddened when he didn't speak in turn. But the work helped her pass the time and put it aside. She was worn out and tired quickly but the impending threat of the Gnolls was incentive to continue.And... it was definitely something else to see the structure they had created. It gave her a very small sense of pride.The mention of food after they cleaned up perked her up considerably and she tailed closely after Ash in anticipation. She was starving.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Indeed, she was a little saddened when he didn't speak in turn. But the work helped her pass the time and put it aside. She was worn out and tired quickly but the impending threat of the Gnolls was incentive to continue."}, "post-76477": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1513128282000", "message": "\"Don't get too excited.\" he told her, already able to sense her enthusiasm. \"The food here is rubbish.\" As they converged at the center of the camp, filing into a crowd of people he he took her wrist, making sure she wasn't diverted by the sheer number of people. While the gnolls stood in a semi-circle around them, forcing them into some semblance of order to pour soup from a large cauldron into a few meager wooden bowls. Gathering up a few bowls that had been left in a pile on in the dirt he inspected them, blowing away a few flies and handing her the slightly-less-filthy one of the two, though the smell of rot wafted off of the wood. Heading up to the \"chef\", he bowed his head, putting a hand on the back of hers and leading her to do the same. Holding out the bowl, the busy gnoll poured in the thick, foul-smelling stew, clearly too distracted to torment them. He led her away, leading her closer to one of the back palisade walls. Normally the slavers tried to keep track of them, but most were too lazy to pay proper attention.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Don't get too excited.\" he told her, already able to sense her enthusiasm. \"The food here is rubbish.\" As they converged at the center of the camp, filing into a crowd of people he he took her wrist, making sure she wasn't diverted by the sheer number of people. While the gnolls stood in a semi-circle around them, forcing them into some semblance of order to pour soup from a large cauldron into a few meager wooden bowls. Gathering up a few bowls that had been left in a pile on in the dirt he inspected them, blowing away a few flies and handing her the slightly-less-filthy one of the two, though the smell of rot wafted off of the wood. "}, "post-76478": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1513128730000", "message": "Wading through the crowds was overwhelming, but Ash holding her wrist did enough to keep her from panicking or being swept away. It was disgusting with so many dirty individuals pressed tightly together and fighting to get food.The bowl was easily a mark of how low things had gotten for them... but she ducked her head and held out her bowl as silently instructed until she felt the weight of the stew in her hands.A single wiff of the stuff was almost enough to make her hurl, and she almost did. A grim look would settle upon the man beside her.\"... what is this...?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Wading through the crowds was overwhelming, but Ash holding her wrist did enough to keep her from panicking or being swept away. It was disgusting with so many dirty individuals pressed tightly together and fighting to get food."}, "post-76479": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1513129727000", "message": "Glancing back at her with a frown, he shrugged. \"I don't know, they don't tell us.\" he lied. In reality, the gnolls were quick to imply it was those of them that couldn't keep up. While he didn't doubt it, however, he did think more stew was certainly served than people came through. \"It's probably horse. Best not to think about it and just eat.\" he added, pressing his back against the wall and sliding down to a sitting position. Looking more directly at her, he motioned for her to join him. \"Get comfortable. This is the only rest we get.\" he explained to her. Leaning his head back against the wood of the wall, he pressed the edge of the bowl to his lips, holding his nose with his free hand and he tipped it back, consuming it in several gulps. Swallowing hard he grimaced, as if willing himself to keep it down before tossing the bowl to the ground. \"Welcome to hell. It's a bit colder than you may have been lead to believe.\" he told her bluntly.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Glancing back at her with a frown, he shrugged. \"I don't know, they don't tell us.\" he lied. In reality, the gnolls were quick to imply it was those of them that couldn't keep up. While he didn't doubt it, however, he did think more stew was certainly served than people came through. \"It's probably horse. Best not to think about it and just eat.\" he added, pressing his back against the wall and sliding down to a sitting position. Looking more directly at her, he motioned for her to join him. \"Get comfortable. This is the only rest we get.\" he explained to her. Leaning his head back against the wood of the wall, he pressed the edge of the bowl to his lips, holding his nose with his free hand and he tipped it back, consuming it in several gulps. Swallowing hard he grimaced, as if willing himself to keep it down before tossing the bowl to the ground. "}, "post-76609": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1513407856000", "message": "Horse. Somehow... she wasn't sure if she could believe that. But she had to choke back the urge to vomit and swallow it down. It was extremely difficult to do - it didn't taste good at all, and it was barely warm. She slid down to sit beside Ash and struggled to finish her bowl. The remark of 'hell' made her cringe and she curled her knees up to her chest - seeming to make herself look a little smaller as she retreated unto herself.She had to pause on the bowl, unsure if she could finish it without a break. \"... why are we here?\" she squeaked, keeping her eyes down. \"W-What are we doing here...? Can... can we ever leave...? Finish our work and they let us go?\" she piped up, sounding a bit hopeful.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Horse. Somehow... she wasn't sure if she could believe that. But she had to choke back the urge to vomit and swallow it down. It was extremely difficult to do - it didn't taste good at all, and it was barely warm. She slid down to sit beside Ash and struggled to finish her bowl. The remark of 'hell' made her cringe and she curled her knees up to her chest - seeming to make herself look a little smaller as she retreated unto herself."}, "post-76611": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1513408561000", "message": "What was crueler? Telling her an obvious lie for her comfort, or to tell her the truth? They had no hope of escaping. The gnolls were faster, could hear and smell better and were the only ones with weapons and armor. Even if they could steal some equipment, it would be gnoll-sized and unwieldy. Turning his stormy gaze to her, he shook his head slowly. \"We're here to work until we die.\" he told her simply. He knew it was devastating news, but he decided it was best to hear outright. \"I've been here for...a little over a year, I think. Everyone else from that long ago died or was sold. I think I've been here the longest now.\" he explained to her. He was fortunate to be fit when he was taken. Even now, he proved in better shape that most, although the signs of malnutrition were clear. \"If you can, you survive until you can't work anymore. Then, they take you into a tent.\" he explained. One of the other reasons he had doubt the meat was human, was because the gnolls lived for it. Apparently they lived for human meat, and the idea that they'd give it to slaves was doubtful to him. \"In the tent they...kill you, I think. Then eat you.\" he told her. though glancing at her he avoided the whole truth. While he would be dragged into the tent to be eaten, she would be for very different reasons. \"Eat the rest of your food, then they'll take you to the girl's tent.\" he told her.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "What was crueler? Telling her an obvious lie for her comfort, or to tell her the truth? They had no hope of escaping. The gnolls were faster, could hear and smell better and were the only ones with weapons and armor. Even if they could steal some equipment, it would be gnoll-sized and unwieldy. Turning his stormy gaze to her, he shook his head slowly. \"We're here to work until we die.\" he told her simply. He knew it was devastating news, but he decided it was best to hear outright. \"I've been here for...a little over a year, I think. Everyone else from that long ago died or was sold. I think I've been here the longest now.\" he explained to her. He was fortunate to be fit when he was taken. Even now, he proved in better shape that most, although the signs of malnutrition were clear. "}, "post-76612": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1513410081000", "message": "The gravity of his words began to sink in, and she found it extremely difficult to continue eating. To work until they died... by whatever means that decided to kill them.A very defeated Madailein abandoned her meal, carefully setting the bowl down on the ground, and wrapped her arms about her raised knees. It was some sort of comforting position to take, though it wasn't doing much at the moment. She didn't want to die here... or be enslaved for the rest of her life.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The gravity of his words began to sink in, and she found it extremely difficult to continue eating. To work until they died... by whatever means that decided to kill them."}, "post-76625": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1513451572000", "message": "Perhaps that hadm't been the best way to tell her, but after so long his felt as if any sense of charisma he may or may not have had was dried up. Even so, he wasn't lacking empathy. Putting an arm around her he sighed softly, giving a small squeeze. \"Who knows, maybe we'll get saved.\" he offered lamely, though it was obvious he himself didn't find that very likely. Them getting to his feet, he reached out for her. \"Come on,\" he offered. \"We'll meet back up tomorrow, alright? I'll still be here.\" he told her softly. It was strange. He was so sure of his fate, so certain that this is where he'd die and he thought that he'd made some modicum of peace with that. But...was that really all there was? Was he going to become like all these other people? Or maybe he'd die still him one day. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Perhaps that hadm't been the best way to tell her, but after so long his felt as if any sense of charisma he may or may not have had was dried up. Even so, he wasn't lacking empathy. Putting an arm around her he sighed softly, giving a small squeeze. \"Who knows, maybe we'll get saved.\" he offered lamely, though it was obvious he himself didn't find that very likely. Them getting to his feet, he reached out for her. \"Come on,\" he offered. \"We'll meet back up tomorrow, alright? I'll still be here.\" he told her softly. "}, "post-76785": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1513615844000", "message": "Still feeling rather defeated, the girl dejectedly lifted her hand to accept his own and pull to her feet. The idea of being saved might have been a good one... but even the man that was now her only friend didn't feel that was going to happen. She could hear it in his voice. This... this couldn't be the end of everything, could it? It just couldn't. Yet it certainly seemed that way.She found he had tugged her along towards one of two fenced-in areas - the walls tall, crude palisades like the ones bordering the territory they were building upon but not as elaborate - strictly for corralling the slaves like cattle. The tops were covered in a rough tent top to at least keep the slaves inside safe from some of the weather. Further away across the expanse that was the camping grounds was another identical enclosed area. The one nearest to the pair of them was piling with men. Scarily enough, the one closer to the Gnolls' tents housed the women.Madailein quickly turned to look up at him as they approached the men's 'camp'. \"D-Don't leave me alone, please,\" she whispered hastily, terrified. Her eyes were pleading for him not to leave her side. She didn't see the Gnoll stomping towards Ash and herself.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Still feeling rather defeated, the girl dejectedly lifted her hand to accept his own and pull to her feet. The idea of being saved might have been a good one... but even the man that was now her only friend didn't feel that was going to happen. She could hear it in his voice. This... this couldn't be the end of everything, could it? It just couldn't. Yet it certainly seemed that way."}, "post-76838": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1513847209000", "message": "Without wasting a moment, Ash certainly did notice the gnoll approaching his time here making him very cautious of this very fact. Facing the gnoll he turned her to face it as well, reaching out and putting a hand on her head as he led her to bow. \"Don't make a scene,\" he hissed, \"They'll just prioritize you. Keep your head down.\" he knew he was pathetic. There was no way he could stand against a gnoll, no way he could survive this hell for a year just to get disemboweled and bleed out here in the dirt accomplishing nothing. \"I can't stay with you\" he whispered quickly, hopefully before the gnoll could get close enough. \"We'll work together tomorrow, just...survive.\" It was hardly a satisfactory answer he knew, but he knew what he was. He wasn't some hero, he wasn't one of the knights he'd seen ride in the courtyard as a child. He was just frightened. Even so, something settled in his gut, burning deep inside as if he'd swallowed a ball of hot lead.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Without wasting a moment, Ash certainly did notice the gnoll approaching his time here making him very cautious of this very fact. Facing the gnoll he turned her to face it as well, reaching out and putting a hand on her head as he led her to bow. \"Don't make a scene,\" he hissed, \"They'll just prioritize you. Keep your head down.\" he knew he was pathetic. There was no way he could stand against a gnoll, no way he could survive this hell for a year just to get disemboweled and bleed out here in the dirt accomplishing nothing. "}, "post-76846": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1513868985000", "message": "The gnoll snarled as his ears twitched around when he heard the male whispering to the female. Without a word he snatched the girl hard by her arm and proceeded to drag her along towards her proper sleeping arrangements.Madailein struggled to keep on her feet, looking back over her shoulder as Ash was left and she was forced along to her new place to sleep - the terrified look in her eyes. She had just managed to find her feet when he stopped, only to be shoved to the ground within the confines of the pen. The palisade doors creaked shut right in front of her face and a heavy steel latch slid into place on the other side. That sound of grinding steel announced she was trapped and alone, and made her stomach twisted into a painful knot. The reality of her being trapped settled in, and she carefully turned her head to look around.She didn't dare look anyone in the eye. But most of the women here were either as terrified as she was, or their eyes were empty. Soulless. They were broken. They huddled in little groups under ugly blankets that were as withered as the rags on their bodies, but it was warmth for the cold nights. Someone became upset over a blanket and a bedroll and a fight ensued. It was clear that men weren't the only aggressors, and this escalated into a brawl of several women over the bedding.The poor girl saw fists flying and hair pulled, heard screaming in rage and pain, and saw terribly cruel things done to the losing woman of the initial fight in some twisted show of dominance. She crawled into a corner of this miserable pen and could hardly tear her eyes away from what happened... or the gnolls that were watching from nearby sentry towers and pointing and laughing. She shivered from the incoming cool air of the approaching night. She couldn't sleep... not now. She wasn't sure she would ever fall asleep...", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The gnoll snarled as his ears twitched around when he heard the male whispering to the female. Without a word he snatched the girl hard by her arm and proceeded to drag her along towards her proper sleeping arrangements."}, "post-76932": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1514112544000", "message": "The men's tent wasn't far from the same scenario, though fortunately Ash could read the signs and the people enough to know when to avoid a confrontation, and when to step up. Most of these men wore a mask of false bravado in order to intimidate the others, but one someone defied them they'd buckle. He wasn't certain if he were the only one to last this long, others began to blend together into an amorphous sea of faces. They came and they went in what seemed like days, their lives amounting to nothing in his passing inspection. Even so, that girl...the thought of her tugged at the back of his mind like an incessant child at his pant leg. Pointing at her, reminding him that he once wasn't so different. Her innocence and hope would be ground to nothing, and she would be just like him. Existing, but nothing more. The idea gnawed at him, frustrated him to his core. It was as if seeing her just reminded of him of what he'd lost. What he'd become and yet it wasn't an anger that was directed at her but himself. Had he really fallen so far? Looking around at the people who huddled together, speaking in low voices lest the gnolls hear them. Could he really say these people meant nothing? Could he really remaine so blase about the torture and death he was forced to witnessed?But what could he do? The gnolls had the strength, they had the weapons, they had the numbers. Squeezing his eyes shut he shook the thoughts out of his head, curling up near the perimeter, sleeping with one eye open and a million thoughts swirling chaotically in his mind. The next morning the gnolls swung open the gates, herding the humans out as they avoided the whips and jeers. Mocking laughter rang out in the cold air above the crowds and for a moment, the young man couldn't help but think of Yuletide. People in the city were celebrating in crowds not unlike this one with laughter in the air. The crack of a whip snapped him out of his as the leather raked across his body, forcing him to fall to one knee, hissing in pain. \"Daydreamin' already? Get movin'!\" a gnoll taunted, another lash of the whip getting Ash to his feet and darting away towards their workplace. Passing the center area where they ate their meals, Ash kept his gaze glued to the ground before he heard the whinny of a horse. The beast kicked and fought against the gnolls that tried to secure it and yet it yanked viciously at the ropes, biting and rearing. It seemed even the gnolls were surprised by its stubborness. With a kick of its hind legs that likely made an unfortunate gnoll unlikely to continue its family tree something skidded across the ground to Ash's feet, partially covered in loose dirt. Glancing around quickly the other gnolls seemed to be focused on the animal's attempts at escape or laughing at their companions obviously painful injury. No one noticed his stoop quickly, picking up the object and inspecting it for a moment. A horseshoe, tarnished with age and use. Quickly he tucked it into his waistband, looking back at the scene, though grimaced when the furious gnoll slit the unfortunate creature's throat. Scowling he followed the flow of people until he was at the build site, looking around for Madailein. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The men's tent wasn't far from the same scenario, though fortunately Ash could read the signs and the people enough to know when to avoid a confrontation, and when to step up. Most of these men wore a mask of false bravado in order to intimidate the others, but one someone defied them they'd buckle. He wasn't certain if he were the only one to last this long, others began to blend together into an amorphous sea of faces. They came and they went in what seemed like days, their lives amounting to nothing in his passing inspection. "}, "post-77362": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1515081657000", "message": "The morning came too slow and too quick at the same time. She had managed to fall asleep at some point, only to awake to the harsh reality of her situation. The gates were flung open and many women were already pushing to herd out and avoid the same treatment the men were receiving. She hadn't been struck, but she heard the whips cracking. It was enough to terrify her into moving with the crowds. Her stomach snarled in a demand for food, but she could smell nothing. She saw no food being offered. Instead, they were headed back towards the structures. They were waking in the dawn for work, and nothing before that.There was another crack, this one so loud it made her cry out in panic. It had happened right behind her. As if on fire, the girl bolted forward with newfound energy - nearly sprinting. She just had to find Ash and get back to work.She had forgotten entirely about the rope about her neck since her first hours of work from the day prior, and suddenly it would be pulled. She would be yanked off her feet by her own momentum and plant her on her stomach in the dirt. When she could stop coughing and breathe again, she would find that same scarred, older Gnoll standing over her with his wide paw standing on her leash. She only raised her eyes up to see it was him and dropped them the next second after - groveling at his feet on her hands and knees as she prayed he would leave her alone.\" 'ey. There ain't no fire - slow down. Yeh start runnin' like that an' people think you tryin' t' run away.\"She never heard the other Gnoll coming up behind her, or see him. Or the rod in his hand that he brought down across her thighs in two sharp strokes and once across her buttocks. She shrieked each time, trying to scramble away only to see the other foot come down on the rope and remove the slack so she had no choice but to be disciplined.\"Yeh gonna run away?\"\"No! No, I won't run! I won't run! Please, I won't run!\" she wept, hoping that this would be the end of it.It was. He let her up, and planted his foot on her head to give her an encouraging shove towards her work destination. He grinned as he watched her struggle to get off her knees and wobble away, eyes on her backside. \"Careful there - lil thing's gotta cute butt. Don't break it 'fore we use it,\" he laughed aloud, elbowing his partner in the little moment of discipline.Madailein stumbled and fell a number of times as her poor legs trembled from the pain in her legs, certain there would be welt or bruises later. But she found where Ash had helped show her how to work and her hammer, and looked about for him - hoping he was near. She had a feeling if she waited around too long it would go noticed by more of their captors.", "link_list": ["/user/2681"], "image_list": [], "html": "The morning came too slow and too quick at the same time. She had managed to fall asleep at some point, only to awake to the harsh reality of her situation. The gates were flung open and many women were already pushing to herd out and avoid the same treatment the men were receiving. She hadn't been struck, but she heard the whips cracking. It was enough to terrify her into moving with the crowds. Her stomach snarled in a demand for food, but she could smell nothing. She saw no food being offered. Instead, they were headed back towards the structures. They were waking in the dawn for work, and nothing before that."}, "post-77498": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1515316097000", "message": "When @slave had reached the building they had been working on, he felt a small spark of relief. She had made it another day. The first day was when the least clever and the most noticeable often perished. Either by more clever, or less noticeable slaves, or in a gnoll's stomach or tent. He approached her swiftly, closing the distance in an effort to eliminate the time she'd be standing alone around here. Stopping once he reached her he looked her over, frowning as he spotted her legs. \"Are you alright?\" he asked. Of course the question was relative, no doubt she was in pain, but she didn't seem seriously wounded or ravaged. Tilting slightly to get a better look at the welts he scowled in anger. \"Let's get to work,\" he urged, hoping to take his mind off of it. Unhooking the bag of nails and handing her the hammer, he headed to the wood, glancing around. This girl was attractive. She was young, even though she looked low-born. Why had the gnolls put her on carpentry duty? She seemed like the type they prioritized in their tents.   Taking note of the people around he drew to an eventual conclusion as they worked, only offering her snippets of advice in the process. The tents had seemed...quieter. Perhaps they were just low on people? He had been so focused on survival, little details like that had begun to escape him. She had been among the first load of slaves in some time. Perhaps they simply couldn't afford to keep her to themselves and not have her build this encampment for whatever unknown reason they seemed to be working for.\"How many people were with you. On the cart I mean?\" the question was curt, and one of the first not about work. Perhaps she could make a conversationalist out of him yet.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When @slave had reached the building they had been working on, he felt a small spark of relief. She had made it another day. The first day was when the least clever and the most noticeable often perished. Either by more clever, or less noticeable slaves, or in a gnoll's stomach or tent. He approached her swiftly, closing the distance in an effort to eliminate the time she'd be standing alone around here. Stopping once he reached her he looked her over, frowning as he spotted her legs. "}, "post-78945": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1517145660000", "message": "Madailein ducked her head and followed along like a scared puppy, wanting to do something - anything - to take her mind off what had happened and how much it hurt. And being within the presence of Ash helped immensely to calm her fears.After a few mis-swings of the hammer and hitting her thumb a couple of times, he spoke up with something not about their task at hand. She stopped only a moment as she was a little surprised, but she resumed quickly. The last thing she wanted was for these beasts to find another excuse to hit her - after already seeing another poor soul being wailed upon just for taking a moment's reprieve earlier.\"Um... ... I-I dunno,\" she murmured, trying to wrack her brain. Most of the ride had been curled up in a corner, trembling in terror. \"M-Maybe 20? I saw another cart besides the one I was in... so I dunno... I was just scared, and wanted to run. But I saw another girl...\" She swallowed hard as she recalled. \"She jumped out and they caught her, and they put her back in the cart...\"She whimpered softly as she stood another nail up and carefully tapped the point into the wood plank before her. \"... did this to her foot, so she couldn't run again...\" The hand with the hammer moved to wipe at her eyes quickly before hitting the nail harder to drive it home.", "link_list": ["/user/2681"], "image_list": [], "html": "Madailein ducked her head and followed along like a scared puppy, wanting to do something - anything - to take her mind off what had happened and how much it hurt. And being within the presence of "}, "post-79022": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1517259922000", "message": "Listening as she spoke he nodded in understanding. It had hardly been his priority when he was picked up to count the other people in the cart, and it was no surprise she hadn't either. Even so, her approximation had been helpful enough. He was almost certain the gnolls weren't getting as many slaves lately. It could simply be the winter, or perhaps Isra had set up some form of patrols. Either way, it meant Madailein would be safe from the tents...for now, anyways. Fitting one of the wooden crossbars he gazed at her for a moment. She was attractive, much moreso than the other woman he'd seen here as of late. No doubt the gnolls had noticed it themselves. What hapened when the next shipment came in? When they had enough to work this job?He recognized what she said about the woman's foot, only nodding. He knew what she was talking about. Should he tell her its only a matter of time before she's dragged away? Perhaps she'd already realized it for herself.\"I can't protect you.\" he said, after a few minutes of silence between them. \"You know that, right? You shouldn't count on me. I could be dead tomorrow, and the only way you'd know is that I won't show up. You need to know how to survive here before they notice you, or they get more people.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Listening as she spoke he nodded in understanding. It had hardly been his priority when he was picked up to count the other people in the cart, and it was no surprise she hadn't either. Even so, her approximation had been helpful enough. He was almost certain the gnolls weren't getting as many slaves lately. It could simply be the winter, or perhaps Isra had set up some form of patrols. Either way, it meant Madailein would be safe from the tents...for now, anyways. Fitting one of the wooden crossbars he gazed at her for a moment. She was attractive, much moreso than the other woman he'd seen here as of late. No doubt the gnolls had noticed it themselves. What hapened when the next shipment came in? When they had enough to work this job?"}, "post-79472": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1518104630000", "message": "AshThe mallet lowered from the nail after almost finishing the task, due to his words. They sunk like stones to the bottom of a pond, only now within her heart. Eyes filled with fear and worry lifted up to meet his own, should he look at her.\"... ... I...\" Her words failed her - she had much to say or ask, but couldn't quite get it all out. But the only thing she could do was scoot a little closer to him. Right now... she HAD to depend on him. He was the only thing that wasn't out to harm her in this terrible place, surrounded by men with ugly stares, women with hateful ones, and monstrous Gnolls with hungry eyes. Nowhere and no one was safe... except with this man.", "link_list": ["/user/2681"], "image_list": [], "html": "<span itemscope=\"\" itemtype=\"http://schema.org/Person\"><a class=\"user-link js-user-link user-2681 group-0\" href=\"/user/2681\" itemprop=\"url\" title=\"@ash\"><span itemprop=\"name\">Ash</span></a></span>"}, "post-79493": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1518139422000", "message": "At first, Ash did everything in his power to ignore her strangely hypnotic gaze. The eyes that made him think about things he had forced from his mind. When she spoke up, a single utterance as she moved closer to him he shied away slightly, his gaze snapping to hers in response. There it was. That flutter in his heart, reminding him of the world outside. Of innocence and beauty, of a place that didn't smell like shit and fear. Then, tearing his gaze away he slammed that box of memories shut once more, staving off the warmth they provided. No, he couldn't dare to hope. The sun had begun to dip in the sky, and the lack of hammering had drawn unwanted attention. Ash seized up when he heard the sound of a snarl around one of the semi-constructed buildings. A gnoll- Reaching out he grasped her shoulder, quickly forcing her to switch positions, taking the hammer roughly from her hand as he motioned for her to hold the beam they were moving. It would no doubt be hard on her, but not as hard as the punishment for not working. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "At first, Ash did everything in his power to ignore her strangely hypnotic gaze. The eyes that made him think about things he had forced from his mind. When she spoke up, a single utterance as she moved closer to him he shied away slightly, his gaze snapping to hers in response. There it was. That flutter in his heart, reminding him of the world outside. Of innocence and beauty, of a place that didn't smell like shit and fear. Then, tearing his gaze away he slammed that box of memories shut once more, staving off the warmth they provided. No, he couldn't dare to hope. "}, "post-79790": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1518925907000", "message": "The sudden gesture from Ash startled her, but she followed suit quickly. Why else would he be that touch of frantic energy? Her head turned on a swivel to try and find the source - and she locked eyes momentarily with a Gnoll... that seemed to be walking in their direction.She hoisted up the beam and struggled to keep it in place in pure desperation as she immediately dropped her eyes back to the ground before her and hoped it would just keep on walking by - flicking her terrified gaze up to Ash for just a moment, understanding immediately. Either this beast was on patrol... or someone was in for punishment. She felt herself begin to tremble slightly as she silently prayed for the former.", "link_list": ["/user/2681"], "image_list": [], "html": "The sudden gesture from "}, "post-79842": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1519060534000", "message": "As the beast turned the corner, casting around viciously, it would find the source if its fury. Approaching behind them, Ash pretended not to notice, although his body was as tense as a coiled spring. No, it had to think it was him. His blue eyes flew wide open as a handful of his shirt was grabbed from behind as the adrenaline coursed through him, yanked off his feet the massive beast tossed him like a doll and he hit the ground hard on his back. \"Well, well, yer chattin' 'stead o' workin'? Got a remedy for that-\" unfurling the whip at his side, Ash struggled for a moment to flip over. The bite of the lash hurt less on the back he knew. Unfortunately, so did his tormentor. The gnoll lunged forward before he could complete his action, stomping down on his stomach with enough force to knock the breath out of his body. Ash likely would have buckled, without the massive paw preventing him from doing so, however he caught sight of the monstrous creature raise its whip. Lifting if arms quickly his forearms blocked his face just in time as the leather tore open the flesh and he gritted his teeth against the pain as blow after blow sliced open his arms, tearing through his sparse clothing to his shoulder in chest as his nerves were on fire with pain. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As the beast turned the corner, casting around viciously, it would find the source if its fury. Approaching behind them, Ash pretended not to notice, although his body was as tense as a coiled spring. No, it had to think it was him. His blue eyes flew wide open as a handful of his shirt was grabbed from behind as the adrenaline coursed through him, yanked off his feet the massive beast tossed him like a doll and he hit the ground hard on his back. "}, "post-79844": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1519061375000", "message": "When Ash was thrown she dropped the beam in a panic and cowered away from the Gnoll, moving behind another beam that had already been set - though it was a pathetic attempt, it was something between it and her. But she saw that whip come into play, and the man was trapped on his back. Her eyes went wide as the arm lifted, and she clapped both hands over her ears when she heard the deafening CRACK of the first strike. His flesh was being cut with each strike, and she trembled in utter terror.Then something moved - she had to do something. She wasn't sure what she could do... but she couldn't let the monster kill him. She stumbled over at the Gnoll's flank and flailed her hands to try and catch the body of the whip as he drew back again, frantic to grab ahold and wrap it about both hands at least once for some leverage as she tried to pull. \"Stop it! Please, stop it!\" she shrieked, desperate to stop this.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When Ash was thrown she dropped the beam in a panic and cowered away from the Gnoll, moving behind another beam that had already been set - though it was a pathetic attempt, it was something between it and her. But she saw that whip come into play, and the man was trapped on his back. Her eyes went wide as the arm lifted, and she clapped both hands over her ears when she heard the deafening CRACK of the first strike. His flesh was being cut with each strike, and she trembled in utter terror."}, "post-79846": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1519064201000", "message": "Ash gritted his teeth in pain as the whip tore at his flesh  and he felt himself weakening. He already knew this was how it was going to end. Beaten to death by a gnoll and bleeding out in the dirt. He;d known it would happen since the day that he'd come here and yet...he'd lasted so long. A year of this, longer than anyone else. His consciousness wavered as if the shroud had already been placed over his face. \"Sleep now\" it whispered, \"It's time to sleep now.\" Then, something changed. He heard another voice. Pleading with his attacker it stopped the whip only momentarily as the gnoll halted to look at the girl, yanking its whip out of her reach and glaring down at her. \"Well well, now I can hardly blame ya for stoppin'!\" it declared, its hand snapping out in an attempt to grab Madailein around her slender throat. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Ash gritted his teeth in pain as the whip tore at his flesh  and he felt himself weakening. He already knew this was how it was going to end. Beaten to death by a gnoll and bleeding out in the dirt. He;d known it would happen since the day that he'd come here and yet...he'd lasted so long. A year of this, longer than anyone else. His consciousness wavered as if the shroud had already been placed over his face. "}, "post-79955": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1519533563000", "message": "The yank of the whip had her stumble forward, only to gasp as a powerful hand latched about her neck and nearly cutting off her air. Both her hands flew to grasp at the one that was squeezing her tiny neck, trying feebly to pry his grip open. In that instance she regretting jumping in, despite the fact she had felt it was right - now she was terrified, and likely to be the next one for a beating.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The yank of the whip had her stumble forward, only to gasp as a powerful hand latched about her neck and nearly cutting off her air. Both her hands flew to grasp at the one that was squeezing her tiny neck, trying feebly to pry his grip open. In that instance she regretting jumping in, despite the fact she had felt it was right - now she was terrified, and likely to be the next one for a beating."}, "post-79984": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1519673608000", "message": "Grinning wickedly the gnoll inspected Madailein with a cruel eye and, with a lurch, took his foot off of Ash heading instead for the simple structure they'd been creating together. On the ground Ash stirred, opening his eyes just barely as he watched the two of them. The gnoll, reaching the building pressed her to one of the walls.\"Pretty girl like you doesn't get taken to the tents huh? Well, I s'pose no one would mind if I sampled ya for meself!\" he taunted, snapping his teeth within inches of her face. Her captor seemed to be enjoying taunting her but there was no doubt it wouldn't stay merely taunting for long. Gnolls were notoriously impatient creatures. On the ground Ash heard the gnoll's sleazy remarks, blinking his eyes, one entirely red and swollen. His clothes were in tatters and hung loosely from his thin but lean frame. Turning over with great effort that caused his nerves to cry out in unison he struggled to rise to his feet. What are you doing? he demanded of himself internally. No, the smart thing to do was to let the gnoll do what it wanted until it left. Then they could both survive! If he did something now, they would both die. Of that he was certain and yet it was as if his body told him otherwise.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Grinning wickedly the gnoll inspected Madailein with a cruel eye and, with a lurch, took his foot off of Ash heading instead for the simple structure they'd been creating together. On the ground Ash stirred, opening his eyes just barely as he watched the two of them. The gnoll, reaching the building pressed her to one of the walls."}, "post-80008": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1519837725000", "message": "She couldn't do anything more but continue to pry at the hard claws latched about her throat, shaking her head in protest as she struggled - letting out a pitiful cry in pure terror as she saw those ugly yet deadly teeth snap right by her face. She kicked out wildly, trying to get him off of her but she just couldn't seem to break his hold. He was so much bigger and stronger than she ever could be - and his words terrified her. She feared the worst, at what this monster had in store for her.All she could do was cry and beg and flail miserably - something to try and stop him - and silently pray for her savior to help her... if he wasn't already dead...", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She couldn't do anything more but continue to pry at the hard claws latched about her throat, shaking her head in protest as she struggled - letting out a pitiful cry in pure terror as she saw those ugly yet deadly teeth snap right by her face. She kicked out wildly, trying to get him off of her but she just couldn't seem to break his hold. He was so much bigger and stronger than she ever could be - and his words terrified her. She feared the worst, at what this monster had in store for her."}, "post-80126": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1520224285000", "message": "Despite Madailein's courageous attempts at fighting off her attacker, her kicks landed uselessly without the force to do much to make the beast even notice her doing so. Lolling out a fetid tongue the creature gave a long lick up the side of her face, its rough surface likely to leave a temporary mark. The other marks it would soon make, however, would not so easily fade with time. \"I'm gonna have lots of fun wit' you, lass.\" the gnoll taunted, howling with laughter at the prospect. On his feet, staggering towards the incomplete building, the gnoll's laughter echoed through Ash's mind. He grit his teeth, eyes blazing in a sudden stroke of fury. It was then that seed of hate, planted so deeply in his mind, hibernating through the winter of his enslavement seemed to burst open introducing a tangled bramble of thorns. The fruition of his rebellion. He dashed then, silent of his feet with no shoes as he sought the only weapon he had at his disposal: The horseshoe tucked away into his rope-belt. Gripping it in his fist he rounded the corner out of the gnoll's lecherous site and, dashing forward Ash leapt once, using one of the lower beams to vault. The gnoll had at last had enough of its torturous game, deciding to go for its main prize and attempting to disrobe its victim never noticed Ash's attack. That was, until metal, driven by anger, desperation, and no small amount of momentum bludgeoned into the side of its skull. Its eyes bulged at the impact and, though gnolls powerfully muscled, it toppled from such a severe impact, staggered. Before the gnoll could regain its bearings Ash's hand shot out, yanking free the oversized dagger the creature used for executions and, without so much as a cry of ferocity he began plunging it over and over again into the gnoll's vulnerable stomach. As it opened its mouth he free hand moved, slamming its palm into the creature's jaw to force its mouth closed as he delivered a few more stabs to the gut. Then, yanking the blade free he moved it to the gnoll's throat, slashing across in a river of blood. All of this had happened in an instant and almost entirely in an eerie silence. Then, as the gnolls struggled turned to errant twitches, Ash at last stepped back, hands shaking, face and front covered in blood and less savory things. Turning he looked at Madailein, hate dominating his vision until it softened only slightly at the sight of her. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Despite Madailein's courageous attempts at fighting off her attacker, her kicks landed uselessly without the force to do much to make the beast even notice her doing so. Lolling out a fetid tongue the creature gave a long lick up the side of her face, its rough surface likely to leave a temporary mark. The other marks it would soon make, however, would not so easily fade with time. "}, "post-80130": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1520225673000", "message": "She couldn't even scream as her mentality was tormented - feeling the beast lick her made her stomach roll from the foul stench that came from it's maw. And the tattered rags about her legs gave partially away with a terribly loud rip as the Gnoll tried to pull them off.This monster was going to ruin her...Suddenly the grip on her throat was gone and she let out a startled sound as she heaved in a deep breath, her body hitting the ground hard. Frantic and terrified eyes watched as her protector went on a wild rampage. Blood was splashing everywhere, even a little on her cowering form - but mostly across Ash's face and arms and rags. He had become a madman, but as she watched the Gnoll fall limp in silence everything around her went quiet. She couldn't hear any hammering or construction in the vicinity or the distance. No one yelling. No bark of Gnolls. Just dead silence.Ash looked to her, and it took several seconds before she could remember to breathe. Her heart was hammering in her ears and banging about the inside of her chest.He had just... killed it. Just like that.The man looked insane.She had no words. She could only stare, hands clinging to her pitiful rags for some attempt to remain covered.... what would they do now...?", "link_list": ["/user/2681"], "image_list": [], "html": "She couldn't even scream as her mentality was tormented - feeling the beast lick her made her stomach roll from the foul stench that came from it's maw. And the tattered rags about her legs gave partially away with a terribly loud rip as the Gnoll tried to pull them off."}, "post-80131": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1520226502000", "message": "Staring at Madailein, he noted her look of horror. Then, looking down at himself, he seemed to fully register what had happened. He was covered in blood...gnoll's blood. He was as good as dead. There was no way he could dispose of this body and clean himself before they noticed and, even if he could, what then? Go back to what they'd done before? His heart hammered in his chest, and his fingers occasionally twitched as his raw, animal instinct kicked in. No. No, he couldn't live like a damned animal, not after what he'd done. Not after his senses were flooded with a sweet release no experience in this past year could have hoped to match. He had taken a life. A sentient being, no matter how barbaric had its existence snuffed by his vicious attack... and he did not regret it even for an instant. Yet, in his mind, he had the same flash of doubt she did. What would they do now? His eyes darted around, always so observant and now hardened with a murderer's glint. If she was afraid of him, so be it. He had already come this far for her sake. If there was any way he could subvert the gnoll's plans even slightly by getting her out of here so be it. Turning his gaze at her, his blood-splattered face was cold and still as marble. \"We're escaping.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Staring at Madailein, he noted her look of horror. Then, looking down at himself, he seemed to fully register what had happened. He was covered in blood...gnoll's blood. He was as good as dead. There was no way he could dispose of this body and clean himself before they noticed and, even if he could, what then? Go back to what they'd done before? His heart hammered in his chest, and his fingers occasionally twitched as his raw, animal instinct kicked in. No. No, he couldn't live like a damned animal, not after what he'd done. Not after his senses were flooded with a sweet release no experience in this past year could have hoped to match. "}, "post-80134": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1520227677000", "message": "... escaping...Just yesterday he had said that wasn't to happen. And it couldn't - the Gnolls were everywhere, and massive and armed to the teeth...! She couldn't even get this one off of her, and now they were...Her wide, terror-filled eyes sparked with a flicker of hope, but it snuffed just as quickly. \"... h-how...?\" she whimpered, suddenly darting her eyes around as she noticed they weren't alone. A group of slaves, maybe four men, had stopped dead and stared in shock and awe and disbelief at the dead Gnoll and the bloodied Ash. They were frozen in place, uncertain - as she was.", "link_list": ["/user/2681"], "image_list": [], "html": "... escaping..."}, "post-80135": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1520230343000", "message": "How? Wasn't that the question. How were they going to act on his bold declaration? Already the formula if a plan began to conjure up an idea on his mind. He had been so certain he could never escape he had shoved all thoughts of it deep down, burying it in hopelessness. Even now, he didn't truly believe he could escape. But, if he could just get her...His eyes widened slightly as she looked past him, whipping around with the knife held at the ready. Witnesses. If it were just one, maybe he could have done something about it before he cried out, but four?No, this wasn't an obstacle. This was an opportunity. One he couldn't afford to let pass him by. Glancing around swiftly he realized they didn't have much time. \"You can scream now and call every gnoll over here. You may get a crust of bread, or avoid a beating for your trouble. Or-\" he reached down, picking up the club, riveted with notched metal that the gnoll had kept as a main weapon and tossing it to the ground at the nearest man's feet. \"-you can escape. The stable: They keep the horses for food, but some can still run. Gnolls are fast, but they're not faster than horses.\" he stooped, rifling through one of the gnoll's pouches and giving a soft grunt of victory as he withdrew flint and steel. \"All we need is a distraction.\" Then, picking up the whip, he looked at Madalailein, holding it out to her. It didn't require much strength to use, but it wasn't going to be dealing any lethal blows. \"We need to move. We have two minutes.\" he added, looking at the men to see if they were with him or against him. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "How? Wasn't that the question. How were they going to act on his bold declaration? Already the formula if a plan began to conjure up an idea on his mind. He had been so certain he could never escape he had shoved all thoughts of it deep down, burying it in hopelessness. Even now, he didn't truly believe he could escape. But, if he could just get her...His eyes widened slightly as she looked past him, whipping around with the knife held at the ready. Witnesses. If it were just one, maybe he could have done something about it before he cried out, but four?"}, "post-80136": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1520230828000", "message": "The idea of escape was more than enough to bring the four to Ash's side, desperate enough to try. One of them picked up the club and held it tightly in both hands, as if this was the key to his life.Madailein hesitated for only a second before taking the weapon in hand. It was heavier than she thought, but now she understood how vicious this thing was in the hands of a Gnoll. But she could swing it - if she could crack it like it had been done to her, it might deter anything coming at her for a brief moment.This was happening. The realization was in her eyes as she looked back up to Ash. They were really going to try and escape.", "link_list": ["/user/2681"], "image_list": [], "html": "The idea of escape was more than enough to bring the four to "}, "post-80139": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1520232780000", "message": "They were at a severe disadvantage, even now. There weren't enough weapons for everyone and the gnolls still had the numbers and the strength. However, for all of the creature's advantages, they had disadvantages as well. Their hearing could work against them if enough chaos was incited, their sensitive eyes blinded by fire. Glancing at Madailein he gripped his dagger tightly. Last of all, their noses were strong. They'd get the scent of blood much quicker than the scent of an escaping prisoner. He would be her cowl. No gnoll would think twice of her if they were occupied with his scent. That was, at least, the hope. Kneeling at the foundation of the building they had spent so much time on he struck the flint and steel together.\"As soon as the fire starts we must move.\" he informed them quickly. \"We'll split into three groups. You with the club and one other, go down the center towards the cooking area. You two, grab what weapons you can and head towards the tents to rouse the other prisoners. We'll free the horses.\" he instructed. So clipped and full of conviction were in words, he doubted the prisoners would protest, although likely if they considered his words long enough they would find flaws in his reasoning. They might even find that he had no intention of risking Madailein's life to save their own. Fortunately for Ash, they didn't have the luxary of time to consider his orders. As soon as the flames caught the wooden foundation, spurred on by a dried out burlap bags the nails had occupied the alarm began. Loud snarls from around them at a distance as the acrid scent of burning burlap filled the air. Picking up a few other bags of nails and, most importantly, his horseshoe, he put his hands on Madailein's shoulders, steering her away as their plan began. \"You run parallel to me.\" he instructed. \"As fast as you can. I'll keep up, and keep you safe.\" he explained, making his way to the side of a building and scaling it wouthout much difficulty, keeping his body low as he moved across the roof. Behind them the fire quickly caught the wooden beams of the building, as if fed by the suffering it had taken to make it. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "They were at a severe disadvantage, even now. There weren't enough weapons for everyone and the gnolls still had the numbers and the strength. However, for all of the creature's advantages, they had disadvantages as well. Their hearing could work against them if enough chaos was incited, their sensitive eyes blinded by fire. Glancing at Madailein he gripped his dagger tightly. Last of all, their noses were strong. They'd get the scent of blood much quicker than the scent of an escaping prisoner. He would be her cowl. No gnoll would think twice of her if they were occupied with his scent. That was, at least, the hope. Kneeling at the foundation of the building they had spent so much time on he struck the flint and steel together."}, "post-80319": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1520745532000", "message": "There wasn't any time to think, but what was there to think about? The men scrambled off to do as instructed - frantic for weapons and to rile up as many as possible to their cause. The fires grew and drew significant attention, though not to bring anyone immediately near - especially the Gnolls. No one wanted to risk burning.Madailein was confused but her blood was pumping in anticipation and anxiety. This was really happening. She couldn't get up to where he was at, but she kept herself pressed to the building, shaking. The adrenaline was coursing. And the frenzy that man and beast was in with everyone running around - it was madness.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "There wasn't any time to think, but what was there to think about? The men scrambled off to do as instructed - frantic for weapons and to rile up as many as possible to their cause. The fires grew and drew significant attention, though not to bring anyone immediately near - especially the Gnolls. No one wanted to risk burning."}, "post-80472": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1520910368000", "message": "Atop the roofs, Ash followed Madailein, his distance and the smell of fire thankfully keeping the gnolls from detecting them. That did not, however, extend to all of them. One of the gnolls, having split off from the main group to find the cause of the fire, spotted Madailein, lips curling into a snarl as he spotted her. He changed forward, hands outwards in an attempt to grab the girl. That was, until Ash leapt down, dagger plunging with the momentum of his fall into the skull of the terrible creature. It yelped in pain, loudly, senseless eyes casting about as its steps caused it to stagger and Ash disentangled himself from the creature's struggles, yanking his knife free with a sickening squelch. It seemed as if his fortunate kills had come to an end, however. Two more gnolls, drawn by the sounds of their fellow rounded the corner as well, spotting them immediately and drawing wicked-looking weapons. Ash bristled, panicked eyes flicking between the two of them. A solitary gnoll not expecting a dagger might have been easy prey, but an outright fight with two? His pulse quickened in the face of inevitable death and, reaching to the burlap sack at his waste he slung it outwards, casting an array of nails across the ground between them as he readied his dagger, his makeshift caltrops the only thing between him and an inevitable death. \"Keep going\" he hissed to Madailein. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Atop the roofs, Ash followed Madailein, his distance and the smell of fire thankfully keeping the gnolls from detecting them. That did not, however, extend to all of them. One of the gnolls, having split off from the main group to find the cause of the fire, spotted Madailein, lips curling into a snarl as he spotted her. He changed forward, hands outwards in an attempt to grab the girl. That was, until Ash leapt down, dagger plunging with the momentum of his fall into the skull of the terrible creature. It yelped in pain, loudly, senseless eyes casting about as its steps caused it to stagger and Ash disentangled himself from the creature's struggles, yanking his knife free with a sickening squelch. "}, "post-80588": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1521303865000", "message": "Despite his urge for her to flee, she latched onto his free arm as she saw the two that were coming. Running would mean he would die... and what was she to do?! Fear was telling her to run for her life-The commotion was only growing around the camp as more and more slaves were starting to rile up and cause a major, disorderly panic. And someone got to the stables to break open the latch. Suddenly there were horses stampeding in every direction and over anyone in their way, men and women running like maniacs, and Gnolls darting everywhere to try and contain the situation - all while a blaze continued to eat away all those months and years of work in mere minutes.One stallion charged right past them, causing the girl to yank Ash towards her in a panic to get him clear of the animal as it rush in front of them - and seemingly at the Gnolls that were closing in only to trample over the nails and scream and flail until it was crashing down atop them in a pained terror.", "link_list": ["/user/2681"], "image_list": [], "html": "Despite his urge for her to flee, she latched onto his free arm as she saw the two that were coming. Running would mean he would die... and what was she to do?! Fear was telling her to run for her life-"}, "post-80691": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1521515280000", "message": "And none too soon! Madailein's loyalty would be her death, he knew it as the gnolls closed in. He glanced back at her, unsure what to say in a situation like this...before she yanked him out of the path of the raging stallion. He stumbled backwards in confusion, the dappled beast passing within inches of his face. His eyes went wide at his near-death and he reached back, catching Madailein's wrist to keep her close. The gnolls were massive, but as the panicked beast stomped upon them he knew the fate that so nearly befell him had come full circle. Seeing his caltrops still scattered in the area he reached down, scooping up the girl in a hurry and throwing her over his shoulders as he gritted his teeth, dashing over the field of nails. He cried out in pain, nearly doubling over as one pierced his unprotected feet but reaching out he grabbed the bit and bridle of the horse, yanking it hard enough for it to face his and, ducking, he barely avoided a nasty bite. He reached up his other hand to stroke its neck, and he was fortunate indeed that the beast was a gentle one. In fact, judging from its saddle it likely had already seen battle, for an empty scabbard was tied by a leather thong to the leather. Stepping forward gingerly and thankfully avoiding nails this time he placed Madalein atop in and, glancing back he spotted at least six more of their captors rounding the corner. Slinging himself into the saddle he flicked the reigns and, with a neigh, the beast charged towards them.Gnolls were strong, and with six of them, even strong enough to stop, or at least kill a horse. Preparing themselves in a line they braced for impact as Ash led it closer and closer...only, at the last moment to yank its reigns between two of the incomplete buildings still standing. The gnolls stood dumbfounded for a moment, out of kilter and not noticing as a nearby building, teetered dangerously before with a loud crack fell  towards them. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "And none too soon! Madailein's loyalty would be her death, he knew it as the gnolls closed in. He glanced back at her, unsure what to say in a situation like this...before she yanked him out of the path of the raging stallion. He stumbled backwards in confusion, the dappled beast passing within inches of his face. His eyes went wide at his near-death and he reached back, catching Madailein's wrist to keep her close. The gnolls were massive, but as the panicked beast stomped upon them he knew the fate that so nearly befell him had come full circle. Seeing his caltrops still scattered in the area he reached down, scooping up the girl in a hurry and throwing her over his shoulders as he gritted his teeth, dashing over the field of nails. He cried out in pain, nearly doubling over as one pierced his unprotected feet but reaching out he grabbed the bit and bridle of the horse, yanking it hard enough for it to face his and, ducking, he barely avoided a nasty bite. "}, "post-80746": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1521726712000", "message": "There was so much movement and chaos that Madailein was swept up in confusion. When Ash picked her up she yelped in alarm, but didn't fight. As soon as she was thrown up into the saddle of the animal she was frantic and clinging to the poor creature's mane in terror. Ash swept up into the saddle behind her and initially she jumped, completely unsettled by the sudden actions. But he was wrapped around her back, guiding this animal around into a hard run.She wasn't used to riding a horse, and the initial jerk and bounce of the horse as they charged forward hurt her behind - but she took solace in the man that was a practical shield over her head. The sudden verge to the side almost threw her from the saddle, but with her savior enveloping her with his strong arms and her death grip on the main along the neck of the animal she managed to stay in her seat.It was strange being atop this animal, feeling every roll of legs and strain of muscles beneath them both, and watching the world just rush by them in seconds. There was so much noise in breaking buildings and screaming people and roaring Gnolls, so much color in earth and structure and fire all around the camp. They were really fleeing... they were running away, getting away from this place...", "link_list": ["/user/2681"], "image_list": [], "html": "There was so much movement and chaos that Madailein was swept up in confusion. When Ash picked her up she yelped in alarm, but didn't fight. As soon as she was thrown up into the saddle of the animal she was frantic and clinging to the poor creature's mane in terror. "}, "post-81031": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1522308756000", "message": "Keeping control of the horse was less a matter of coercion and one of desperation. The beast dodged as best it could, the swinging blades and occasional flail as it raced past and Ash pressed himself over Madailein in an attempt to shield her. Structures, in an inferno and collapsing only further spooked the beast and they were beyond fortunate the beast had been trained well enough by its ill-fated master that it didn't buck the unfamiliar riders. Around them the gnolls were regaining their senses after reeling from the sudden coup, and the results were terrible to behold, even whizzing past them at so high a speed. The humans that attempted to survive were being slaughtered, and even those who tried to throw down their pitiful makeshift weapons were leapt upon by the feral creatures and mauled with tooth and claw. Whatever had banded the gnolls under a singular purpose had been lost to their bestial instincts and they were taking no prisoners. Even unarmed women and men who hadn't raised a hand towards them were torn asunder in their cruel rage. Ash kept Madailein's head low as they rode, finding the distractions coupled with their speed enough to keep themselves one step ahead of the encroaching enemies. At the gates several Gnolls fought off the humans who tried desperately to force their way through, for if they were to die they would rather do it beyond the walls past the borders of freedom. Ash pushed the horse onwards but it whinnied in fright and surprise as a gnoll suddenly leapt at them from the chaos. Ash's eyes widened, yanking free his dagger as the creature closed the distance, unarmed but still equipped with its maw. Its eyes were filled cruel fury and it lunged. Ash lifted with dagger in defense, but realized with horror it had chosen a separate target. Attempting to close its jaws around Madalien's neck he leaned forward in an attempt to shield her with his body. He felt then, the jaws close, the rancid breath and tearing, unbearable pain. Its head tilted to the side and its fangs dug into the flesh of his face. Blood filled his vision, and yet as it tried to close its jaws it found it could not. The dagger had found its mark, not in its brain like Ash had intended, but in the hinge of its jaws. They both struggled. Its massive paws rose to pull him from his mount but, sensing this perhaps, the horse pranced away. The majesty of the movement did nothing to allay the tearing of flesh and the blossoming of unimaginable pain. The right side of Ash's face where the canine's had found their mark had largely torn it away. He screamed, then, and the gnoll staggered backwards as the horse kicked, sending a solid blow to the creature's chest. It fell to its back and was immediately beset by prisoners. Ash gripped the reigns and realized...he couldn't see. Whether it was blood, or pain, or if the gnolls had torn out his very eyes in the attack he could not say. Perhaps it was, in a queer fashion, a blessing. He urged the horse towards where he had last seen the gate. Had he been able to see, he may very well have hesitated a lethal moment. The gnolls had nearly destroyed the prisoners and were at least double the number he had last seen. Yet, unknowingly he pushed the beast onwards. As they changed a few gnolls noticed and, preparing to attack the passing animal were barely prepared when a second wave of desperate people, seeing that even those who stood down were being massacred were forced to fend for their lives. The clinging hands, the swinging of weapons, stolen and fashions, was the smokescreen they so desperately needed. The horse, seeing an opportunity took liberties with its rider's commands and rushed for a weak spot, its broad chest shoving aside two distracted gnolls. Ash couldn't see, but he could hear the swing of weapons so close to his body. Then, against all odds, all reason...they were free. They had broken the line, a few straggling escapees following. The horse, now seeing a defined road stuck to it and they stuck to galloping for how long one could only guess. At last, with heaving flanks and frothing mouth the beast forced itself to a stop. Ash lay heavily against Madailein, blood flowing from his face onto her. Then, without a word he slumped from the horse, landing with a thud to the cold dirt road below. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Keeping control of the horse was less a matter of coercion and one of desperation. The beast dodged as best it could, the swinging blades and occasional flail as it raced past and Ash pressed himself over Madailein in an attempt to shield her. Structures, in an inferno and collapsing only further spooked the beast and they were beyond fortunate the beast had been trained well enough by its ill-fated master that it didn't buck the unfamiliar riders. Around them the gnolls were regaining their senses after reeling from the sudden coup, and the results were terrible to behold, even whizzing past them at so high a speed. The humans that attempted to survive were being slaughtered, and even those who tried to throw down their pitiful makeshift weapons were leapt upon by the feral creatures and mauled with tooth and claw. Whatever had banded the gnolls under a singular purpose had been lost to their bestial instincts and they were taking no prisoners. Even unarmed women and men who hadn't raised a hand towards them were torn asunder in their cruel rage. "}, "post-81061": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1522390701000", "message": "When Ash pressed her low over the neck of the mount she curled up tight with her eyes squeezed shut, terrified as they tore through the camp on horseback. There was so much happening around them, violence and malice and destruction and slaughter. Her ears were flooded with the yells and screams and snarls of all those around them. Even with the sudden redirection and motion of the horse, she remained tensed into a little ball beneath her savior - his scream shattered her world. Without even thinking her eyes snapped open and she saw blood and teeth. The Gnoll was kicked away by the animal and she felt warm blood splatter upon her face, not knowing it was from Ash being wounded. As soon as the color splashed across her sight she squeezed her eyes closed once again and buried her face into the mane of the horse.And just as suddenly, the noise was fading. The pounding hooves were growing louder as the commotion fell behind them and into the distance. But for quite some time she was too terrified to open her eyes, to see where they were.Finally the horse stalled and heaved in a horrible fashion for breath, beyond exhausted. As soon as she pried one eye open, she felt the man over her slump and slide out of the saddle. As his body hit the ground, limp as a doll, Madailein let out a cry of alarm. She hadn't even managed to fall out of the saddle before the animal crashed into the grass beside the road, having run itself to near death. The girl would scoot near and drop to her knees beside Ash, shaking hands reaching out to want to touch him, to help him in some way. Seeing the terrible tear across his face and his skin steeped heavily in blood... she was terrified.But he had done this to save them both... quivering hands would settle tenderly under his other cheek and brush the matted strands of hair from the wound. She had to do something to help him... but what? Frantic eyes were darting to her rags and his, settling to rip away a part of her shirt that exposed her thin midriff - at least it was something she could use to try and wipe away some of the blood. But she didn't know what to do more than that. She wasn't a healer.She wanted to utter his name, to see if he would respond... but she had never gotten it. The realization hit her that he was still a complete stranger. And he had risked his life for them both.", "link_list": ["/user/2681"], "image_list": [], "html": "When Ash pressed her low over the neck of the mount she curled up tight with her eyes squeezed shut, terrified as they tore through the camp on horseback. There was so much happening around them, violence and malice and destruction and slaughter. Her ears were flooded with the yells and screams and snarls of all those around them. Even with the sudden redirection and motion of the horse, she remained tensed into a little ball beneath her savior - his scream shattered her world. Without even thinking her eyes snapped open and she saw blood and teeth. The Gnoll was kicked away by the animal and she felt warm blood splatter upon her face, not knowing it was from "}, "post-81668": {"user": "Ash", "user_num": 2681, "timestamp": "1523850189000", "message": "Ash lay still and pale upon the ground as Madailein attempted to provide succor. A large part of his face had been terribly mauled, yet as she dabbed the blood she would find that he still retained his eye, and most of his features. A stroke of luck, if he ever awoke again to use them. Even so, it was a terrible wound, and had it not been for the adrenaline coursing through him he likely would not have made it even this far. It was not, however, a fatal one. The flow of blood began to stem at the girl's attentions and over the next hour, Ash opened his eyes blearily, although he seemed to be feverish and confused. \"Where are we?\" he croaked, as not long after the charge out the main gates was when he'd lost consciousness. His raised a trembling hand to his face, hissing in pain as his fingertips made contact with his marred visage. Turning his head slightly he turned his pain-glazed eyes to their surroundings. They were in a clearing now, with plains stretching outwards in rolling hills. Raising a hand he pointed at a small light in the distance. It was strange for a candle to be burning so late, but there was no surer sign of life. \"Is that a farm?\" he asked wearily. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Ash lay still and pale upon the ground as Madailein attempted to provide succor. A large part of his face had been terribly mauled, yet as she dabbed the blood she would find that he still retained his eye, and most of his features. A stroke of luck, if he ever awoke again to use them. Even so, it was a terrible wound, and had it not been for the adrenaline coursing through him he likely would not have made it even this far. It was not, however, a fatal one. The flow of blood began to stem at the girl's attentions and over the next hour, Ash opened his eyes blearily, although he seemed to be feverish and confused. "}, "post-82576": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1525582990000", "message": "Her heart jumped into her throat when he finally woke, but it was short lived. He looked terrible, and she didn't know what to do. She could only try to clean him up and make him comfortable... here, in the dirt with nothing for them. Her attention shifted over to the gasping animal that was still lying on the ground before returning her eyes to him.What were they to do-?His lifting hand caught her attention again, and she followed it to the dim light in the distance. Her heart began to race once more, more so when he managed to ask what it was. A farm? Maybe so, and if so maybe they could help! But she couldn't carry this man... not that far, not even half way. She was so small and frail, and he was so large by comparison.... but he had risked himself for their freedom, almost losing his eye and his life.She discarded the dirtied strip of cloth and stood up on shaky legs, and attempted to pull his wrist to try and get him to roll onto his side. From there, if she could even get him that far, she would try fruitlessly to pull him upright and onto her shoulders from a position on her knees. Sadly, she had little strength or energy - but she had to try. She needed to get Ash to safety, and to find him help.", "link_list": ["/user/2681"], "image_list": [], "html": "Her heart jumped into her throat when he finally woke, but it was short lived. He looked terrible, and she didn't know what to do. She could only try to clean him up and make him comfortable... here, in the dirt with nothing for them. Her attention shifted over to the gasping animal that was still lying on the ground before returning her eyes to him."}}